src/derivation/crk-drv.lexc
LEXICON Medials
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(i)hôt-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hôt M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(i)kanak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@kanak M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-1@-(o)hpan-:@P.infl.NDI-1@hpan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(w)êw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@êw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(y)êk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@êk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(âsk)ikan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-(ý)ihk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ac-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ac M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-acaskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@acaskw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aciw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aciw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aciwa-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aciwa M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-acâp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@acâp M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-acâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@acâw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ah-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ah M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahc-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahc M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkamik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkamik M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-1@-ahkwan-:@P.infl.NDI-1@ahkwan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkwan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkwan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkwat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkwat M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkwaý-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkwaý M2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-ahkâ-:@P.infl.VII-v@ahkâ M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahkê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahkê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahpin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpin M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahpit-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpit M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahpêh-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahpêh M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aht M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahâ M2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ahâhko-:@P.infl.VAI-v@ahâhko M2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-ahâht-:@P.infl.VTA-1@ahâht M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahô-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahô M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ahýap-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ahýap M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ak M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-akisiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akisiw M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-akisiy-:@P.infl.NDI-2@akisiy M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-akw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-akâmak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@akâmak M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amahcih-:@P.infl.NONTERM@amahcih M2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-amahcih-:@P.infl.VAI-v@amahcih M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@amik M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-amêkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@amêkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amêkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@amêkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-amêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@amêw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-anak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@anak M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-anakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@anakw M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-anakway-:@P.infl.NA-2@anakway M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-anakway-:@P.infl.NI-2@anakway M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-anakway-:@P.infl.NONTERM@anakway M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-aniway-:@P.infl.NDI-2@aniway M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-anât-:@P.infl.NONTERM@anât M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ap-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ap M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-apason-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apason M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-apatê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@apatê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-as-:@P.infl.NONTERM@as M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asak M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-asakay-:@P.infl.NA-2@asakay M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-2@-asakay-:@P.infl.NDA-2@asakay M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-asakâtihp-:@P.infl.NA-1@asakâtihp M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asakâtihp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asakâtihp M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ascâp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ascâp M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asik M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asin M2F ;
@P.infl.VTA-1@-asin-:@P.infl.VTA-1@asin M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-1@-asiskitân-:@P.infl.NDI-1@asiskitân M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-asiskitân-:@P.infl.NI-1@asiskitân M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asiw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ask-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ask M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askamik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askamik M2F ;
@P.infl.VII-n@-askanw-:@P.infl.VII-n@askanw M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-askasiy-:@P.infl.NA-2@askasiy M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-2@-askasiy-:@P.infl.NDA-2@askasiy M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askat-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askat M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-askatay-:@P.infl.NDI-2@askatay M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-askatihkway-:@P.infl.NA-2@askatihkway M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-askatihkway-:@P.infl.NDI-2@askatihkway M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askatêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askatêw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askin M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askina-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askina M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askis-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askis M2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-askisin-:@P.infl.IPC@askisin M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-askisin-:@P.infl.NI-1@askisin M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askisin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askisin M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-askosiy-:@P.infl.NI-2@askosiy M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askosiy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askosiy M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askotê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askotê M2F ;
@P.infl.VII-v@-askotê-:@P.infl.VII-v@askotê M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-askow-:@P.infl.NI-2@askow M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-askw-:@P.infl.NA-1@askw M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-askw-:@P.infl.NA-3@askw M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-askw-:@P.infl.NI-3@askw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-askwam-:@P.infl.NONTERM@askwam M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ast-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ast M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-astimw-:@P.infl.NA-3@astimw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-astimw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astimw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-astê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-astêwi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@astêwi M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asâk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asâk M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-asâkay-:@P.infl.NI-2@asâkay M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asâkay-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asâkay M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-asîhk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@asîhk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-at-:@P.infl.NONTERM@at M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ataw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ataw M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-atay-:@P.infl.NDI-2@atay M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-atay-:@P.infl.NI-2@atay M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atay-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atay M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-?@-atin-:@P.infl.NI-?@atin M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atin-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atin M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atinaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atinaw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atiw M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-atonask-:@P.infl.NA-1@atonask M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-atonisk-:@P.infl.NA-1@atonisk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atow-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atow M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atwê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atâ-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâ M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâm M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atâw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atâwahk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atâwahk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atêsk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atêsk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-atêwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@atêwê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awak M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awisw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awisw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-awêk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@awêk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ayapisk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ayapisk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ayih-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ayih M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aýa-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aýa M2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-aýakap-:@P.infl.IPC@aýakap M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-3@-aýakaskw-:@P.infl.NDI-3@aýakaskw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-aýâp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@aýâp M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-cicâhkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@cicâhkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-cicâskay-:@P.infl.NDI-2@cicâskay M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cicâskay-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cicâskay M2F ;
@P.infl.IPC@-cihc-:@P.infl.IPC@cihc M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cihc-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cihc M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-cihciy-:@P.infl.NA-2@cihciy M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-cihciy-:@P.infl.NDI-2@cihciy M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-cihciy-:@P.infl.NI-2@cihciy M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cihciy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cihciy M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cim-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cim M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-cisk-:@P.infl.NA-1@cisk M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-1@-cisk-:@P.infl.NDI-1@cisk M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-cisk-:@P.infl.NI-1@cisk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cisk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cisk M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-1@-ciwâ(m)-:@P.infl.NDA-1@ciwâ M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-1@-ciwâm-:@P.infl.NDA-1@ciwâm M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ciwâm-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ciwâm M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-coy-:@P.infl.NONTERM@coy M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-1@-câhkos-:@P.infl.NDA-1@câhkos M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-câhkos-:@P.infl.NONTERM@câhkos M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cân M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-1@-câpân-:@P.infl.NDA-1@câpân M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-câpân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@câpân M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cêpihk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cêpihk M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-cêpihkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@cêpihkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-cêpihkw-:@P.infl.NI-3@cêpihkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cêskiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cêskiw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cêskiwak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cêskiwak M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cêstat(ay)-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cêstat M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-cêstatay-:@P.infl.NDI-2@cêstatay M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-cêstatay-:@P.infl.NI-2@cêstatay M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cêstatay-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cêstatay M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-2@-cîhcâwâw-:@P.infl.NDA-2@cîhcâwâw M2F ;
@P.infl.NDA-1@-cîhcîkom-:@P.infl.NDA-1@cîhcîkom M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cîhcîkom-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cîhcîkom M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-cîhcîkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@cîhcîkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hc-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hc M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-1@-hcikwan-:@P.infl.NDI-1@hcikwan M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-hcikwan-:@P.infl.NI-1@hcikwan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hcikwan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hcikwan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hk M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkas-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkas M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkasw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkasw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkatw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkatw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkokan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkokan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkom-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkom M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkomân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkomân M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkop-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkop M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkwasT-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkwasT M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-1@-hkwâkan-:@P.infl.NA-1@hkwâkan M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-1@-hkwâkan-:@P.infl.NDI-1@hkwâkan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkwâkan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkwâkan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkwê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkwê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hkâp-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hkâp M2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-hkê-:@P.infl.VAI-v@hkê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hpw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hpw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ht M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-3@-htakw-:@P.infl.NI-3@htakw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-htawak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@htawak M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-2@-htawakay-:@P.infl.NA-2@htawakay M2F ;
@P.infl.NDI-2@-htawakay-:@P.infl.NDI-2@htawakay M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-2@-htawakay-:@P.infl.NI-2@htawakay M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-htawakay-:@P.infl.NONTERM@htawakay M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-htw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@htw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-hýaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@hýaw M2F ;
@P.infl.IPV@-i-:@P.infl.IPV@i M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-iT-:@P.infl.NONTERM@iT M2F ;
@P.infl.NA-3@-icâhkw-:@P.infl.NA-3@icâhkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-icê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@icê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ihamw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihamw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ihk-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihk M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-ihkomân-:@P.infl.NI-1@ihkomân M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ihkw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihkw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-iht-:@P.infl.NONTERM@iht M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ihtak-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihtak M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ihtakw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihtakw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ihtw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihtw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ihtêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ihtêw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ik-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ik M2F ;
@P.infl.NI-1@-ikan-:@P.infl.NI-1@ikan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ikan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ikaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikaw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-iko-:@P.infl.NONTERM@iko M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ikw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ikwan-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikwan M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ikwân-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikwân M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-ikâtê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@ikâtê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-im-:@P.infl.NONTERM@im M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-in-:@P.infl.NONTERM@in M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-iniw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@iniw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-inê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@inê M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-isi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@isi M2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-isi-:@P.infl.VAI-v@isi M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-isiw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@isiw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-iskw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@iskw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-iskwâstaw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@iskwâstaw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-iskêw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@iskêw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-isîwi-:@P.infl.NONTERM@isîwi M2F ;
@P.infl.VAI-v@-ito-:@P.infl.VAI-v@ito M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-itw-:@P.infl.NONTERM@itw M2F ;
@P.infl.NONTERM@-itê-:@P.infl.NONTERM@itê M2F ;
